Maryland, session 2025, HB0979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
18–504.
(a) (1) If the occupant is in default for a period of more than 60 days, the
operator may enforce the lien by selling the personal property stored in the leased space at
a public sale, for cash.
(2) Proceeds from the sale shall be applied to satisfy the lien, and any
surplus shall be disbursed as provided in subsection (e) of this section.
(b) (1) Before conducting a sale under subsection (a) of this section, the
operator shall, subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, notify the occupant of the default
by hand delivery, verified mail, or electronic mail at the occupant’s last known address.
(2) (i) The operator may not notify the occupant of the default by
electronic mail unless:
– 1 –

Ch. 210 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. The rental agreement, or a written change to the rental
agreement, specifies, in bold type, that notice may be given by electronic mail; and
2. The occupant provides the occupant’s initials next to the
statement in the rental agreement specifying that notice of default may be given by
electronic mail.
(ii) If the operator notifies the occupant of the default by electronic
mail at the occupant’s last known address and does not receive a response [or a
confirmation of delivery] sent from the occupant’s electronic mail address OR A
CONFIRMATION OF DELIVERY, the operator shall send a second notice of default to the
occupant by verified mail to the occupant’s last known postal address.
(3) The notice shall include:
(i) A statement that the contents of the occupant’s leased space are
subject to the operator’s lien;
(ii) A statement of the operator’s claim, indicating the charges due
on the date of the notice, the amount of any additional charges which shall become due
before the date of sale, and the date those additional charges shall become due;
(iii) A demand for payment of the charges due within a specified time,
not less than 14 days after the date that the notice was mailed;
(iv) A statement that unless the claim is paid within the time stated,
the contents of the occupant’s space will be sold at a specified time and place; and
(v) The name, street address, and telephone number of the operator,
or his designated agent, whom the occupant may contact to respond to the notice.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, AT
LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE CONDUCTING A SALE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE OPERATOR
SHALL NOTIFY THE OCCUPANT OF THE TIME, PLACE, AND TERMS OF THE SALE BY
HAND DELIVERY, VERIFIED MAIL, OR ELECTRONIC MAIL AT THE OCCUPANT’S LAST
KNOWN ADDRESS.
(II) IF AN OPERATOR NOTIFIES THE OCCUPANT OF THE SALE BY
ELECTRONIC MAIL AT THE OCCUPANT’S LAST KNOWN ADDRESS AND DOES NOT
RECEIVE A RESPONSE SENT FROM THE OCCUPANT’S ELECTRONIC MAIL ADDRESS OR
A CONFIRMATION OF DELIVERY AT LEAST 5 DAYS BEFORE THE SALE, THE OPERATOR
SHALL PROMPTLY SEND A SECOND NOTICE OF SALE TO THE OCCUPANT BY VERIFIED
MAIL TO THE OCCUPANT’S LAST KNOWN POSTAL ADDRESS.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 210
(5) At least 3 days before conducting a sale under this section, the operator
shall advertise the time, place, and terms of the sale:
(i) In a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction where
the sale is to be held;
(ii) By electronic mail; or
(iii) On an online website.
(c) At any time before a sale under this section, the occupant may pay the amount
necessary to satisfy the lien and redeem the occupant’s personal property.
(d) (1) A sale under this section shall be held at the self–service storage facility
where the personal property is stored.
(2) A sale under this section shall be deemed to be held at the self–service
storage facility where the personal property is stored if the sale is held on an online auction
[Web site] WEBSITE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 3 –